Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-627
Unlawful manufacture of a financial transaction device; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of unlawful manufacture of a financial transaction device if, with intent to defraud, such person:

(a) Falsely makes or manufactures, by printing, embossing, or magnetically encoding, a financial transaction device;

(b) Falsely alters or adds service marks, optical characters, or holographic images to a device which is, purports to be, or is circulated to become or represent if completed a financial transaction device; or

(c) Falsely completes a financial transaction device by adding to an incomplete device to make it appear to be a complete one.

(2) Any person committing the offense of unlawful manufacture of a financial transaction device shall be guilty of a Class IIA felony.

Laws 1989, LB 372, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 39.